ru: Профиль язычка варгана: Длинный; Узкий; Короткий; Стандартный; Толстый; Тонкий; Широкий; Другое
zh-CN: 犹太竖琴簧片轮廓: 长; 窄; 短; 标准; 厚; 薄; 宽; 其他
cs: Profil jazýčku brumle: Dlouhý; Úzký; Krátký; Standardní; Silný; Tenký; Široký; Jiné
de: Profil der Maultrommelzunge: Lang; Schmal; Kurz; Standard; Dick; Dünn; Breit; Sonstige
nb: Tungeprofil for munnharpe: Lang; Smal; Kort; Standard; Tykk; Tynn; Bred; Annet
sk-SK: Profil rezonančnej platničky na drumbli: Dlhý; Úzky; Krátky; Štandardný; Hrubý; Tenký; Široký; Iné
it: Profilo della linguetta dello scacciapensieri: Lungo; Stretto; Corto; Standard; Spesso; Sottile; Largo; Altro
pt-PT: Perfil da palheta do berimbau: Longo; Estreito; Curto; Padrão; Espesso; Fino; Largo; Outro
fr: Profil de la languette de la guimbarde: Long; Étroit; Court; Standard; Épais; Fin; Large; Autre
vi: Hình dạng lưỡi đàn môi: Dài; Hẹp; Ngắn; Tiêu chuẩn; Dày; Mỏng; Rộng; Khác
lt-LT: Dambrelio liežuvėlio profilis: Ilgas; Siauras; Trumpas; Standartinis; Storas; Plonas; Platus; Kita
es: Perfil de la lengüeta de arpa de boca: Largo; Estrecho; Corto; Estándar; Grueso; Fino; Ancho; Otro
pl: Profil języka harfy żydowskiej: Długi; Wąski; Krótki; Standardowy; Gruby; Cienki; Szeroki; Inny
sv: Tungprofil för mungiga: Lång; Smal; Kort; Standard; Tjock; Tunn; Bred; Annat
hr-HR: Profil jezika židovske harfe: Dugi; Uski; Kratki; Standardni; Debeli; Tanki; Široki; Ostalo
el: Προφίλ γλωσσίδας άρπας στόματος: Μακρύ; Στενό; Κοντό; Τυπικό; Παχύ; Λεπτό; Φαρδύ; Άλλο
nl: Mondharp tongprofiel: Lang; Smal; Kort; Standaard; Dik; Dun; Breed; Overig
sl-SI: Profil jezička dromlje: Dolgo; Ozko; Kratko; Standardno; Debelo; Tanko; Široko; Drugo
tr: Ağız kopuzunun dil profili: Uzun; Dar; Kısa; Standart; Kalın; İnce; Geniş; Diğer
hu: A doromb nyelvprofilja: Hosszú; Keskeny; Rövid; Normál; Vastag; Vékony; Széles; Egyéb
bg-BG: Профил на езичето на варгана: Дълъг; Тесен; Къс; Стандартен; Дебел; Тънък; Широк; Друг
ro-RO: Profilul limbii harpei de gură: Lungă; Îngustă; Scurtă; Standard; Groasă; Subțire; Lată; Altele
th: ลักษณะของลิ้นจิวฮาร์พ: ยาว; แคบ; สั้น; มาตรฐาน; หนา; บาง; กว้าง; อื่นๆ
ko: 구금 혀 모양: 롱; 내로우; 쇼트; 스탠다드; 시크; 씬; 와이드; 기타
zh-TW: 口簧琴簧舌形狀: 長; 窄; 短; 標準; 厚; 薄; 寬; 其他
da: Tungeprofil for mundharpe: Lang; Smal; Kort; Standard; Tyk; Tynd; Bred; Andet
en: Jew's harp tongue profile: Long; Narrow; Short; Standard; Thick; Thin; Wide; Other
pt-BR: Berimbau de boca estilo da armação: Longo; Estreito; Curto; Padrão; Grosso; Fino; Largo; Outro
fi: Munniharpun kieliprofiili: Pitkä; Kapea; Lyhyt; Vakio; Paksu; Ohut; Leveä; Muu
ja: 口琴の舌の形状: ロング; ナロー; ショート; スタンダード; シック（厚め）; シン（薄め）; ワイド; その他